Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-1,125
Emergencies; proclamation; director; effect; temporary office.

(1) Whenever the director is of the opinion that an emergency exists, or is impending, he or she may, by proclamation, authorize any financial institution located in the affected area to close any or all of its offices. In addition, if the director is of the opinion that an emergency exists, or is impending, which affects, or may affect, a particular financial institution, or a particular office of such financial institution, but not banks located in the area generally, he or she may authorize the particular financial institution or office of the financial institution affected to close. Any office so closed shall remain closed until the director proclaims that the emergency has ended or until such time as the officers of the financial institution determine that one or more offices closed because of the emergency should reopen, whichever occurs first, and, in either event, for such further time thereafter as may reasonably be required to reopen.

(2)(a) Whenever the director authorizes a financial institution to close pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or to remain closed pursuant to section 8-1,126, he or she, in writing, may further authorize the financial institution to open a temporary office at a designated location for the period of time during which the financial institution or office is to remain closed, subject to extensions requested by the financial institution and authorized by the director, except that in no event may the director authorize a temporary office to operate for a total period of longer than thirty months.

(b) The director may authorize a financial institution to open a temporary office after consideration of (i) the ability of the financial institution to conduct its business in the area where the financial institution or the office of the financial institution was closed without opening a temporary office and (ii) the proximity of the financial institution or office of the financial institution to the proposed temporary office.

(c) The director may authorize a mobile branch to operate as a temporary office for any closed office of a financial institution other than its main office.

(d) The director may orally authorize a financial institution to open a temporary office to operate for a period no longer than four business days.

Laws 1971, LB 523, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 117.